Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-34.5] Authority to modify and amend
development agreements with eligible developers. The corporation is
authorized to amend, delete, restate, and otherwise modify the terms,
conditions, plans, specifications, and all other matters relating, directly or
indirectly, to any housing project that was previously approved by the
corporation, including the terms, covenants, and conditions of any development
agreement for a housing project between the corporation and an eligible
developer. [L 2009, c 143, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next